California, session 20252026, AB1859.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1771.25 is added to the Labor Code, to read:1771.25. (a) (1) An awarding body or owner shall shall, except as provided in paragraph (5), allow representatives of a joint labor-management committee established pursuant to the federal Labor Management Cooperation Act of 1978 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 175a) to have reasonable access to active public works job sites to monitor compliance with the prevailing wage and apprenticeship requirements of this chapter.(2) For purposes of this section, “reasonable access” means access that is consistent with job site safety and security requirements, including the use of personal protective equipment, that does not disrupt performance of work. Reasonable access includes access to workers during nonwork time.(3) An awarding body, owner, contractor, or subcontractor is not liable for any violations of safety standards caused by a representative of a joint labor-management committee.(4) If a representative of a joint labor-management committee is injured on a job site while performing duties pursuant to this section, the committee’s workers’ compensation or liability insurance policy, or both, shall be the exclusive remedy of the representative, and the awarding body, owner, contractor, or subcontractor, shall not have any liability.(5) An awarding body, owner, contractor, or subcontractor may deny or revoke access to a representative of a joint labor-management committee that fails or refuses to comply with applicable job site safety requirements, including the use of required personal protective equipment.(6) A joint labor-management committee shall, upon request, provide proof of general liability insurance and workers’ compensation coverage, if applicable, prior to being granted access to a job site pursuant to this section.(7) As a condition of access to a job site pursuant to this section, a joint labor-management committee shall indemnify and hold harmless the awarding body, owner, contractor, and subcontractors, from and against claims, damages, or liabilities to the extent caused by the negligent acts or omissions or willful misconduct of the committee or its representatives while on the job site.(b) (1) (A) A joint labor-management committee described in subdivision (a) may bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction against an awarding body, contractor, or subcontractor that willfully denies the committee’s representative reasonable access in violation of this section.(B) The action described in this paragraph shall be brought within six months after the denial of access.(2) (A) A court in an action described in paragraph (1) shall may award a prevailing joint labor-management committee a civil penalty of not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each occasion that reasonable access was willfully denied.(B) A court in the action described in paragraph (1) shall award a prevailing joint labor-management committee its reasonable attorney’s fees and costs incurred in maintaining the action, costs, including expert witness fees. fees, to the prevailing party in any action brought pursuant to this subdivision.(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), this section does not apply to public works job sites for entities that are required to comply with Sections 45122.1, 45125, and 45125.1 of the Education Code.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.